Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.140

License—Procedures, requirements, fees.

Each person now qualified to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry, licensed as a veterinary technician, or registered as a veterinary medication clerk in this state or who becomes licensed or registered to engage in practice shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 2007 c 235 s 6; 2000 c 93 s 13; 1996 c 191 s 79; 1993 c 78 s 6; 1991 c 3 s 247; 1985 c 7 s 72; 1983 c 102 s 6; 1941 c 71 s 16; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-16. FORMER PARTS OF SECTION: (i) 1941 c 71 s 17; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-17, now codified as RCW 18.92.142. (ii) 1941 c 71 s 19, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-19, part, now codified as RCW 18.92.145.]